Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.010

Space and facilities authorized.

Cities of the first and second classes are authorized to provide off-street parking space and facilities located on land dedicated for park or civic center purposes, or on other municipally-owned land where the primary purpose of such off-street parking facility is to provide parking for persons who use such park or civic center facilities. In addition a city may own other off-street parking facilities and operate them in accordance with RCW 35.86A.120.

[ 1997 c 361 s 16; 1975 1st ex.s. c 221 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 13; 1965 c 7 s 35.86.010. Prior: 1961 c 186 s 1; 1959 c 302 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 221: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 221 s 5.]

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.

Off-street parking space and facilities in towns: RCW 35.27.550 through 35.27.600.

Public parks in or beneath off-street parking space or facilities—Revenue bond financing—Special funds—Use of off-street and on-street parking revenues: RCW 35.41.010.